Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB27.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 809.3. Surgical smoke evacuation systems.(a) Mitigation.--On or before January 1, 2026, or the date that is 90 days after the effective date of this subsection, whichever is later, an ambulatory surgical facility or hospital shall adopt and implement policies to mitigate exposure to surgical smoke through the use of a smoke evacuation system for 123456789101112131415161718192021 each procedure that generates surgical smoke. Development of the surgical smoke mitigation policy shall be in consultation with the entire surgical team at the facility. The surgical smoke mitigation policy shall be such that the facility may select any smoke evacuation system that accounts for surgical techniques and procedures vital to patient safety and considers the safety of those individuals working in the operating room.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Smoke evacuation system." Equipment and technologies that capture surgical smoke in order to mitigate the effects of the surgical smoke on the ocular and respiratory tracts of the occupants of the operating room . "Surgical smoke." The surgical plume or gaseous byproduct that is produced from the interaction of tools or heat-producing equipment used for dissection and hemostasis during surgical or invasive procedures.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0027PN0008 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819